lt-LT: Sukibimo paviršiaus tipas: Neslystantis įdėklas; Kulno-pirštų suėmimas; Rievėtas; Perforuotas; Briaunuotas; Gumuotas; Lygus; Su dygliukais; Tekstūruotas; Kita
es: Tipo de superficie de agarre: Inserto antideslizante; Agarre talón-punta; Moleteado; Perforado; Acanalado; Engomado; Liso; Con tachuelas/puntas; Texturizado; Otro
zh-CN: 防滑表面类型: 防滑嵌件; 跟趾防滑; 滚花; 打孔; 条纹; 包胶; 光滑; 饰钉/带刺; 纹理; 其他
zh-TW: 握把表面類型: 防滑嵌件; 腳跟-腳趾防滑; 滾花; 打孔; 羅紋; 橡膠塗層; 平滑; 帶釘/尖刺; 紋理; 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta površine drške: Protuklizni umetak; Prianjanje prsti-peta; Nazubljeno; Perforirano; Rebrasto; Gumirano; Glatko; Sa zakovicama/šiljcima; Teksturirano; Ostalo
sv: Typ av greppyta: Halkskyddande inlägg; Häl-tå-grepp; Lettrad; Perforerad; Räfflad; Gummerad; Slät; Dubbad/spikad; Strukturerad; Övrigt
nl: Type grip-oppervlak: Antislip-inzetstuk; Hiel-teen-grip; Gekarteld; Geperforeerd; Geribbeld; Met rubbercoating; Glad; Met noppen/spikes; Getextureerd; Overig
pl: Typ powierzchni chwytu: Wkładka antypoślizgowa; Przyczepność pięta-palce; Radełkowany; Perforowany; Żebrowany; Gumowany; Gładki; Z wypustkami / kolcami; Teksturowany; Inne
en: Grip surface type: Anti-slip insert; Heel-toe grip; Knurled; Perforated; Ribbed; Rubberized; Smooth; Studded/spiked; Textured; Other
ru: Тип поверхности сцепления: Противоскользящая вставка; Сцепление пятка-носок; С накаткой; Перфорированная; Ребристая; Прорезиненная; Гладкая; Шипованная; Текстурированная; Другое
da: Greboverfladetype: Skridsikkert indlæg; Hæl til tå-greb; Reifet; Perforeret; Rillet; Gummibelagt; Glat; Nittet/pigget; Struktureret; Andet
sk-SK: Typ povrchu rukoväte: Protišmyková vložka; Grip na päte a špičke; Vrúbkovaný; Perforovaný; Rebrovaný; Pogumovaný; Hladký; Vybíjaný/s hrotmi; Textúrovaný; Iné
sl-SI: Vrsta oprijemalne površine: Protizdrsni vstavek; Oprijem od pete do prstov; Narebričen; Perforiran; Rebrast; Gumiran; Gladek; Z zatiči/čepki; Teksturiran; Drugo
cs: Typ povrchu rukojeti: Protiskluzová vložka; Grip na patě a špičce; Rýhovaný; Perforovaný; Žebrovaný; Pogumovaný; Hladký; S hroty / ostny; Texturovaný; Ostatní
bg-BG: Тип повърхност на захвата: Противоплъзгаща вложка; Захват пета-пръсти; Накатена; Перфорирана; Оребрена; Гумирана; Гладка; С шипове/шипчета; Текстурирана; Друго
ro-RO: Tipul suprafeței de prindere: Inserție anti-alunecare; Prindere călcâi-degete; Striat; Perforat; Nervurat; Cauciucat; Neted; Cu ținte/crampoane; Texturat; Altele
nb: Overflatetype for grep: Antiskli-innlegg; Hæl/tå-grep; Riflet; Perforert; Rillet; Gummibelagt; Glatt; Pigger; Teksturert; Annet
it: Tipo di superficie dell'impugnatura: Inserto antiscivolo; Grip tacco-punta; Zigrinato; Perforato; A coste; Gommato; Liscio; Borchiato/chiodato; Strutturato; Altro
ko: 그립 표면 유형: 미끄럼 방지 인서트; 힐 토우 그립; 널링 처리됨; 타공형; 골지형; 고무 처리됨; 매끄러운 형태; 스터드/스파이크형; 질감 있는 형태; 기타
de: Oberflächentyp des Griffs: Anti-Rutsch-Einsatz; Fersen-Zehen-Grip; Gerändelt; Perforiert; Gerippt; Gummiert; Glatt; Mit Noppen/Spikes; Texturiert; Sonstige
hu: Markolatfelület típusa: Csúszásgátló betét; Sarok-lábujj markolat; Recézett; Perforált; Bordázott; Gumírozott; Sima; Szegecses/tüskés; Texturált; Egyéb
pt-BR: Tipo de superfície de empunhadura: Inserto antiderrapante; Grip calcanhar-ponta; Serrilhado; Perfurado; Nervurado; Emborrachado; Suave; Com cravos/tachas; Texturizado; Outro
ja: クリップ表面タイプ: 滑り止めインサート; ヒール・トゥ・グリップ; ローレット加工; パンチング加工; リブ加工; ラバーコーティング; スムース; スタッズ/スパイク付き; テクスチャ加工; その他
vi: Loại bề mặt bám tay: Miếng chèn chống trượt; Bề mặt nhám gót-mũi; Khía nhám; Đục lỗ; Có gân; Bọc cao su; Nhẵn; Có đinh/gai; Có vân; Khác
tr: Tutuş yüzeyi tipi: Kaymaz ek parça; Topuk-burun tutuşu; Tırtıllı; Delikli; Yivli; Kauçuk kaplamalı; Pürüzsüz; Çivili/dikenli; Dokulu; Diğer
th: ประเภทพื้นผิวจับยึด: แผ่นกันลื่น; กริปส้นและปลายเท้า; ลายกันลื่น; เจาะรู; เป็นซี่; เคลือบยาง; เรียบ; มีปุ่ม/มีสไปก์; มีพื้นผิว; อื่นๆ
fr: Type de surface de prise: Insert antidérapant; Adhérence talon-pointe; Moleté; Perforé; Côtelé; Caoutchouté; Lisse; Clouté/à pointes; Texturé; Autre
pt-PT: Tipo de superfície de aderência: Inserção antiderrapante; Aderência calcanhar-biqueira; Serrilhado; Perfurado; Canelado; Emborrachado; Suave; Com tachas/pitões; Texturado; Outro
fi: Pinnan otetyyppi: Liukuesteupotus; Kanta-varvas-pito; Rihletty; Rei'itetty; Uurrettu; Kumoitu; Sileä; Nastallinen/piikillinen; Teksturoitu; Muu
el: Τύπος επιφάνειας πρόσφυσης: Αντιολισθητικό ένθετο; Λαβή φτέρνας-δακτύλων; Σαγρέ (knurled); Διάτρητο; Με ραβδώσεις; Με επίστρωση καουτσούκ; Λείο; Με καρφιά/προεξοχές; Ανάγλυφο; Άλλο